src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON CEAKCAGAT !!≈ * **@CODE@** Like seamu but plural only
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4X7 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4 flagOFF-R ;
 +Ess:%>X4n K ;
 +Ess:%>X4n%> NPxC ;
! +Cmp/SgNom:%>X8 flagON-R ; seems redundant, why is it here?
! +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R; seems redundant, why is it here?
 +Pl+Nom:%>X2at K ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>X2ijddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>X2ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Pl+Nom:%>X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažža%>n K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažža%>n%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>X4t K ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPx1C ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jde K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxPlComC ;
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;


LEXICON VUOIGNAHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@** LikeDAIVVAS but only Pl. vuoiŋŋaš:vuoigŋahat
 +Cmp/SgNom:š%>X4X7 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:š%>X4 flagOFF-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:š%>X8 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:š%> flagOFF-R ;
 +Ess:%>X4šin K ;
 +Pl+Nom:h%>X2at K ;
! +Pl+Nom:h%>X2ijddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Pl+Gen:h%>X2ijd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:h%>X2ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:h%>X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:h%>X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:h%>X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:h%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:h%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:h%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:h%>X2ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Gen:h%>X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:h%>X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:h%>X2ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:h%>X2ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:h%>X2ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:h»X2ažža%>n K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:h»X2ažža%>n%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:h»X2ažža%>X4t K ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPx1C ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jd R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jde K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:h»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxPlComC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:š»X4W4#heapmi%> HEAPMI ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Ess+Use/-PLX:š»X4W4#heapmi%>X1n K ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Ess+Err/Orth:š»X4W4#heapmi%>X7n K ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:š»X4W4#heapmi%>X1n%> NPxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:š»X4W4#heapmi%>X7n%> NPxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+Use/-PLX+A:š»X4W4#his ATTR ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+Use/-PLX+A:š»X4W4#his VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +Use/-PLX:š%>X8 GEAHTES ;




!!!!    2d. Action nouns
!        -------------


LEXICON EAMOSH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** váikkuheamoš, deverbals
@C.NeedNoun@ EAMOSHcase ; ! We want the POS tag before the flag
                                          ! diacritic to avoid problems for the
                                          ! tag reordering regex.


LEXICON AMOSH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** váikkuhamoš, deverbals
@C.NeedNoun@ AMOSHcase ;



LEXICON BOAHTINLONGSHORT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Intransitiv action nouns from bisyll verbs, long and short cmp-form
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:%> NPx12C  ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:%>X7 flagON-R ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
 +Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá K ;
 +Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi K ;
 +Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđá K ;
 +Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđi K ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:X7# VEARA ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:# VEARA ;
 +Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>in K ;   ! Dialects
 +Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>en K ;   !Dialects
! +Sem/Act+Ess:%>e K ; !not for nouns
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Gen+Allegro: K ;  !
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%> NPxC ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgGen:%>a R ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc: K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%> NPxC ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>ak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
! +Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>asa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijnna K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd R ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ijnna K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>istti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>isti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;
