src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns  !!= * **@CODE@** is pointed to from NounRoot above
EU-duháhat+N+CmpNP/First+Sem/Dummytag:EU-duháh9 CEAKCAGAT ;
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
ambulánsavuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN+OLang/UND:ambulánsa#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
asttuáiggevuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:asttu#áigge#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
badjelluottavuodjin+N:badjel#luotta#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
beanavuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:beana#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
bihkkaboaldin+N+CmpN/SgN:bihkka#boaldim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
birravuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:birra#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
boastaruktovuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:boasta#rukto#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
boastaruvttavuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:boasta#ruvtta#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
boastaruvttovuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:boasta#ruvtto#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
bonjadeamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:bonjadeapmo7š EAMOSH ;
bonjadamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:bonjadamoš AMOSH ;
bussevuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:busse#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
ceakcagat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:ceakºcag8 CEAKCAGAT ;
crossvuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:cross9#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
cuiggodamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:cuiggodamoš AMOSH ;
cuiggodeamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:cuiggodeapmo7š EAMOSH ;
dearvahat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:dearºvah9 CEAKCAGAT ;
divodamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:divodamoš AMOSH ;
divodeamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:divodeapmo7š EAMOSH ;
duhpátboaldin+N+CmpN/SgN:duhpát#boaldim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
dárbovuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:dárbo#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
eastagat+N+Sem/Dummytag:easºtag8 CEAKCAGAT ;
eretvuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:eret#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
friddjastiilavuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:friddja#stiila#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
friijastiilavuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:friija#stiila#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
geassevuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:geasse#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
gonagasvuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:gonagas#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
guossohamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:guossohamoš AMOSH ;
guossoheamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:guossoheapmo7š EAMOSH ;
gáhtavuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:gáhta#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
gárrenvuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:gárren#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
heastavuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:heasta#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
joavkovuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:joavko#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
lasihamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:lasihamoš AMOSH ;
lasiheamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:lasiheapmo7š EAMOSH ;
lobihisvuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:lobihis#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
lustaáiggevuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:lusta#áigge#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
meahcceboaldin+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:meahcce#boaldim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
mohtorvuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:mohtor#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
muitalamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:muitalamoš AMOSH ;
muitaleamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:muitaleapmo7š EAMOSH ;
muohtaskuhtervuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:muohta#skuhter#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
muosáhamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:muosáhamoš AMOSH ;
muosáheamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:muosáheapmo7š EAMOSH ;
njunušráidovuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:njunuš#ráido#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
oktiivuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:oktii#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
ovttaguvluivuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:ovtta#guvlui#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
poastaruvttevuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:poasta#ruvtte#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
promillavuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:promilla#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
rekreašunvuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:rekreašun#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
ráhkkanamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:ráhkkanamoš AMOSH ;
ráhkkaneamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:ráhkkaneapmo7š EAMOSH ;
seavdnjadinvuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:seavdnjadin#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
skohterlustavuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:skohter#lusta#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
skohtervuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:skuter#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
skutergilvovuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:skuter#gilvo#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
turistavuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:turista#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
vuoigŋahat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Body:vuojgŋa VUOIGNAHAT ;
váikkuhamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:váikkuhamoš AMOSH ;
váikkuheamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:váikkuheapmo7š EAMOSH ;
ámmátvuodjin+N:ámmát#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
árvaleamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:árvaleapmo7š EAMOSH ;
árvalamoš+N+Sem/Dummytag:árvalamoš AMOSH ;
čáhcevuodjin+N+CmpN/SgN:čáhce#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ;
